Illinois, session 104th, SB100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.4 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/5.4)7    Sec. 5.4. Retired investigators and sworn law enforcement 8personnel Retiring investigators; purchase of service firearm 9and badge. 10    (a) The Board shall establish a program to allow an 11investigator appointed under paragraph (20.6) of subsection 12(c) of Section 4 who is honorably retiring in good standing to 13purchase either one or both of the following: (1) any badge 14previously issued to the investigator by the Board; or (2) if 15the investigator has a currently valid Firearm Owner's 16Identification Card, the service firearm issued or previously 17issued to the investigator by the Board. The badge must be 18permanently and conspicuously marked in such a manner that the 19individual who possesses the badge is not mistaken for an 20actively serving law enforcement officer. The cost of the 21firearm shall be the replacement value of the firearm and not 22the firearm's fair market value.23    (b) The Board shall:  SB0100 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08026 JDS 18072 b1        (1) allow sworn law enforcement personnel employed by 2    the Board who retire in good standing to keep their 3    previously issued Board identification cards. The Board 4    shall stamp in red lettering "RETIRED" recognizing their 5    retired status; or6        (2) issue photographic identification cards to sworn 7    law enforcement personnel employed by the Board who retire 8    in good standing that indicate their separation from 9    service and identify the person as having been employed by 10    the Board as sworn law enforcement personnel.11    If a Board-issued identification card described in this 12subsection is lost or stolen, the Board shall immediately 13reissue a replacement identification card that meets the 14requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) upon written request by 15the retired sworn law enforcement personnel. 16(Source: P.A. 102-719, eff. 5-6-22.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.